Hawaii statutes.
[§124A-6] Judge advocates and legal
officers. (a) The governor, on the recommendation of the adjutant
general, shall appoint an officer of the state military forces as state judge
advocate. To be eligible for appointment, an officer must be a member of the
bar of the highest court of the State and must have been a member of the bar of
the State for at least five years.

(b) The adjutant general may appoint as many
assistant state judge advocates as the adjutant general considers necessary.
To be eligible for appointment, assistant state judge advocates must be
officers of the state military forces and members of the bar of the highest
court of the State.

(c) The state judge advocate or the state
judge advocate's assistants shall make frequent inspections in the field in
supervision of the administration of military justice.

(d) Convening authorities shall at all times
communicate directly with their staff judge advocates or legal officer in
matters relating to the administration of military justice; and the staff judge
advocate or legal officer of any command may communicate directly with the
staff judge advocate or legal officer of a superior or subordinate command, or
with the state judge advocate.

(e) No person who has acted as member, law
officer, trial counsel, assistant trial counsel, defense counsel, assistant
defense counsel, or investigating officer, or who has been a witness for either
the prosecution or defense, in any case may later act as staff judge advocate
or legal officer to any reviewing authority upon the same case. [L 1982, c 171,
pt of §2; gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next